Ohio, session 136, HB834.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 125.91 and 125.911 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 125.91. (A) As used in this section and section 125.911 of the Revised Code: (1) "Delivery of government services" means any action taken by a state agency related to providing a benefit or service to a resident, business, or organization of this state, including any action taken by a contractor or nonprofit organization acting on behalf of a state agency or administering a state-funded program. (2) "Government service delivery channel" means the format or medium through which a delivery of government services occurs. (3) "High impact service" means a delivery of government services identified as being a priority for improvement by the director of administrative services due to the service's scale and impact. (4) "State agency" has the same meaning as in section 1.60 of the Revised Code, except that it does not include the general assembly, any legislative agency, or the governor. (B)(1) The director of administrative services shall designate an employee of the department to serve as the government service delivery lead within the department of administrative services. (2) The government service delivery lead shall do all of the following: (a) Facilitate and coordinate efforts to improve the delivery of government services by state agencies, with priority given to high-impact services; (b) Serve as the lead, government-wide official responsible for supporting the delivery of government services; (c) Advise the director concerning improvements to the delivery of government services; (d) In consultation with each state agency's service delivery official and any other state agency stakeholder, develop and oversee the implementation of delivery standards, policies, and guidelines for the delivery of government services. The delivery standards, policies, and guidelines shall do all of the following: (i) Consider the needs of the resident, business, or organization receiving government services; (ii) Solicit and consider feedback regarding the delivery of government services; (iii) Assess the delivery of government services process; (iv) Consider the factors of ease, efficiency, transparency, accessibility, fairness, burden, and duration, including wait and processing times, with respect to the delivery of government services; (v) Encourage the adoption of commercial products and services to ensure holistic government service delivery channels and to measure customer service satisfaction. (e) Collect and report quantitative and qualitative data on the delivery of government services; (f) Evaluate the quality of the delivery of government services, including through the establishment of performance metrics developed using the standards, policies, and guidelines developed pursuant to division (B)(2)(d) of this section, and the data collected and reported pursuant to division (B)(2)(e) of this section; (g) Engage with stakeholders to identify leading practices in service design and delivery that would improve the delivery of government services across and within agencies; (h) Coordinate with department of administrative services stakeholders and other state agency stakeholders on the delivery of government services; (i) Carry out any other duties prescribed by the director. (C) Not later than ninety days before the first session of the general assembly each year, the director shall prepare and submit to the governor, the president of the senate, and the speaker of the house of representatives a report that describes current and future efforts to improve the delivery of government services. Sec. 125.911. (A) The director or administrative head of each state agency is responsible for the agency's delivery of government services which shall, at minimum, include improving and enhancing the delivery of government services to better achieve the mission of the state agency and to build and maintain trust, transparency, and accountability. (B) Not later than one hundred eighty days after the effective date of this section, the director or administrative head of each state agency shall designate an employee of the state agency to implement this section. The designated employee shall do all of the following: (1) Report directly to the director, deputy director, or administrative head of the state agency; (2) Possess sufficient authority to implement improvements to the delivery of government services within the state agency, particularly for high-impact services; (3) Coordinate and execute efforts to improve and enhance the delivery of government services and the government service delivery channels of the state agency, under the direction of the director or administrative head of the state agency, and in collaboration with relevant state agency officials; (4) At the direction of the government service delivery lead and not later than one year after the effective date of this section, submit an implementation plan for improving the state agency's delivery of government services; (5) Coordinate the collection and reporting of data required by the government service delivery lead and use the data to improve the delivery of government services; (6) Facilitate collaboration among and between state agencies, and components within the state agency and other state agencies, in coordination with the government service delivery lead, to improve and enhance the delivery of government services; (7) Assist in incorporating this section's requirements into the state agency's plans.